Maine, session 132, LD647.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §1566, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 615, Pt. B, §1, is amended to
read:
§1566. Telephone and video call services in jails
Beginning October 1, 2022 2025, a jail and a service provider that contracts with the
jail to provide telephone and video call services for residents of the jail shall provide
telephone and video call services in accordance with this section.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Jail" means a county or municipal detention facility for which standards are set by
the Commissioner of Corrections under Title 34‑A, section 1208 or a facility for which
standards are set by the Commissioner of Corrections under Title 34‑A, section
1208‑A.
B. "Resident" means a person who resides in a jail.
C. "Service provider" means an entity that provides telephone or video call services
by contract with a jail through which a resident initiates outgoing telephone or video
calls from the jail.
2. Requirements for service providers. A service provider that enters into or renews
a contract on or after October 1, 2022 2025 with a jail to provide outgoing interstate and
intrastate telephone and video call services is subject to the following requirements. The
rates and charges that the service provider may charge for interstate and intrastate telephone
calls made by residents may not exceed the rates for interstate telephone calls adopted by
the Federal Communications Commission in effect on the date of the contract.
A. The rates and charges that the service provider may charge for interstate and
intrastate telephone and video calls made by residents may not exceed the rates for
interstate telephone and video calls adopted by the Federal Communications
Commission in effect on the date of the contract.
B. A service provider may not charge a fee to a resident, a jail or a county or
municipality for providing the free outgoing telephone or video calls required pursuant
to subsection 3, paragraphs A and B.
C. A service provider may not charge a connection fee to a resident to initiate an
outgoing telephone or video call.
D. A service provider shall permit the receiving party of a telephone or video call to
terminate the telephone or video call prior to connection without the resident or
receiving party incurring a charge.
E. A service provider may not block a collect telephone or video call to a receiving
party because the service provider lacks a prior billing relationship with the receiving
party's telephone or video call service provider unless the service provider offers debit,
prepaid or prepaid collect calling options.
F. A service provider, prior to connecting a telephone or video call, shall identify itself
to the receiving party and disclose to the receiving party how to obtain rate quotations.
Page 1 - 132LR0569(01)

G. A service provider may not charge a fee to deposit money into a resident’s telephone
or video call account.
3. Resident right to make telephone and video calls. A sheriff or jailer shall provide
a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make interstate and intrastate telephone and
video calls in accordance with jail policies and institutional procedures and in accordance
with the following.
A. A sheriff or jailer shall provide a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make
telephone and video calls to relatives and friends, except that the sheriff or jailer may
restrict or prohibit telephone and video calls when the restriction or prohibition is
necessary for the security of the jail. A sheriff or jailer shall provide to a resident who
has less than $50 in the resident's jail account a telephone and video call allowance for
90 minutes of free telephone and video calls per week under this paragraph. Unused
minutes must carry over to the next week.
B. A sheriff or jailer shall provide a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make
telephone and video calls protected by the attorney-client privilege. A sheriff or jailer
shall provide a resident free telephone and video calls with the resident's attorney.
Sec. 2. 34-A MRSA §3015, as amended by PL 2023, c. 217, §1, is further amended
to read:
§3015. Telephone and video call services in Department of Corrections facilities
Beginning October 1, 2022 2025, the department and a service provider that contracts
with the department to provide telephone and video call services for residents of a
department facility shall provide telephone and video call services in accordance with this
section.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Department facility" means a detention facility or correctional facility.
B. "Resident" means a person who resides in a department facility.
C. "Service provider" means an entity that provides telephone or video call services
by contract with the department through which a resident initiates outgoing telephone
or video calls from a department facility.
2. Resident right to make telephone and video calls. The department shall provide
a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make interstate and intrastate telephone and
video calls in accordance with departmental policies and institutional procedures and in
accordance with the following.
A. The department shall provide a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make
telephone and video calls to relatives and friends, except that the department may
restrict or prohibit telephone and video calls when the restriction or prohibition is
necessary for the security of the department facility. The department shall provide to a
resident who has less than $10 in the resident's facility account a free telephone and
video call allowance for 30 90 minutes of free telephone and video calls per week under
this paragraph. Unused minutes must carry over to the next week.
Page 2 - 132LR0569(01)

B. The department shall provide a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make
telephone and video calls protected by the attorney-client privilege. The department
shall provide to a resident who has less than $10 in the resident's facility account a free
telephone call allowance for 30 minutes of telephone calls per week under this
paragraph and video calls with the resident's attorney.
The chief administrative officer of each department facility shall draft, publish and
implement guidelines governing resident access to free telephone and video calls as
required by paragraphs A and B in that facility.
3. Requirements for service providers. A service provider that enters into or renews
a contract on or after October 1, 2022 2025 with the department to provide outgoing
interstate and intrastate telephone and video call services is subject to the following
requirements.
A. The rates and charges that the service provider may charge for interstate and
intrastate telephone and video calls made by residents may not exceed the rates for
interstate telephone and video calls adopted by the Federal Communications
Commission in effect on the date of the contract.
B. A service provider may not charge a fee to a resident, the department facility or the
department for providing the free outgoing telephone or video calls required pursuant
to subsection 2, paragraphs A and B.
C. A service provider may not charge a connection fee to a resident to initiate an
outgoing telephone or video call.
D. A service provider shall permit the receiving party of a telephone or video call to
terminate the telephone or video call prior to connection without the resident or
receiving party incurring a charge.
E. A service provider may not block a collect telephone or video call to a receiving
party because the service provider lacks a prior billing relationship with the receiving
party's telephone or video call service provider unless the service provider offers debit,
prepaid or prepaid collect calling options.
F. A service provider, prior to connecting a telephone or video call, shall identify itself
to the receiving party and disclose to the receiving party how to obtain rate quotations.
G. A service provider may not charge a fee to deposit money into a resident’s telephone
or video call account.
Sec. 3. Application. That portion of this Act that amends the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 30-A, section 1566, subsection 2 applies to all contracts for telephone and
video call services entered into or renewed by or on behalf of a jail on or after October 1,
2025. That portion of this Act that amends Title 34-A, section 3015, subsection 3 applies
to all contracts for telephone and video call services entered into or renewed by the
Department of Corrections on or after October 1, 2025.